Wyoming, session 2026, SF0083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-4-110 is amended to read:

22-4-110. Composition of state central committee;
voting.

(a) The state central committee consists of state
committeemen and committeewomen and county chairmen elected
at the odd-numbered year meeting of the county central
SF0083

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0469
committees, and of any other party officials provided by
the bylaws of the party.

(b) Voting on any action of the state central
committee shall be conducted in a manner so that the votes
of each voting member are weighted based on the number of
registered voters of the party at the last congressional
election in the county of the voting member compared to the
total number of statewide registered voters of the party at
the last congressional election.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0083